Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.850

Institutional education programs—Timeline and plan. (Expires June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1827-S.SL) ***

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop a timeline and plan for assuming, by September 1, 2027, responsibility for the delivery of basic education services to justice-involved students who are under the age of 21 and served through institutional education programs in facilities that are not under the jurisdiction of the department of social and health services or the department of corrections. The timeline and plan shall consider: The findings and recommendations produced in accordance with section 2, chapter 303, Laws of 2023; recommendations provided in the December 1, 2022, improving institutional education outcomes final report of the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of children, youth, and families; staffing transitions for educators and staff that, as of July 23, 2023, deliver education programming and services to the justice-involved students; and legislation enacted in 2024 and in subsequent years relating to the superintendent's requirements under RCW 28A.190.150.

(2) Beginning December 15, 2023, and annually thereafter through 2026, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, provide an interim report on progress made in achieving the requirements of this section to the governor and the education and fiscal committees of the legislature.

(3) In meeting the requirements of this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consult with organizations representing educators and staff that deliver education programming and services to justice-involved students who are under the age of 21 and served through institutional education programs in facilities that are not under the jurisdiction of the department of social and health services or the department of corrections.

(4) This section expires June 30, 2027.

[2023 c 303 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 303: See note following RCW 28A.190.150.